Ohio, session 136, HB676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 955.01, 955.024, and 955.11 be amended and sections 305.87, 955.025, 955.111, and 955.25 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 305.87. (A) As used in this section, "animal" means an animal that is legally seized or disposed of and such seizure or disposal is or becomes the financial responsibility of a board of county commissioners. (B) A board of county commissioners may provide for the abatement, control, or removal of one or more animals from land in the county if the board determines that the maintenance of or lack of care of the animal constitutes a nuisance. The board may employ the necessary labor, materials, and equipment to perform such action. (C) A board of county commissioners may recoup the costs incurred by the board in performing actions under division (B) of this section from the owner of land upon which the animal or animals were primarily kept in accordance with the process prescribed in division (D) of this section. (D)(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, at least seven days before providing for the abatement, control, or removal of any animal, the board of county commissioners shall notify the landowner and any holders of liens of record upon the property of both of the following: (a) That the owner is ordered to abate, control, or remove the animal or animals because the maintenance or care of the animal or animals have been determined by the board to be a nuisance. (b) If the animal or animals are not abated, controlled, or removed, or if provision for abatement, control, or removal is not made, within seven days, that the board shall provide for such abatement, control, or removal, and that any costs incurred by the board in performing that task shall be entered upon the tax list and become a lien upon the land upon which the animal or animals were kept from the date of entry. (2) If the board of county commissioners provide for or are financially responsible for the abatement, control, or removal of an animal or animals and such action was done in an emergency situation, the board shall so notify the owner of the land upon which the animal or animals were kept and any holders of liens of record upon the land of the abatement, control, or removal and that the costs incurred by the board in performing that action shall be entered upon the tax list and become a lien upon the land from the date of entry. (E) The board shall send the notice to the owner of the land by certified mail if the owner is a resident of the county or is a nonresident whose address is known, and by certified mail to lienholders of record; alternatively, if the owner is a resident of the county or is a nonresident whose address is known, the board may give notice to the owner by causing any of its agents or employees to post the notice on the principal structure on the land and to photograph that posted notice with a camera capable of recording the date of the photograph on it. If the owner's address is unknown and cannot reasonably be obtained, it is sufficient to publish the notice once using at least one of the following methods: (1) In the print or digital edition of a newspaper of general circulation in the county; (2) On the official public notice web site established under section 125.182 of the Revised Code; (3) On the web site and social media account of the county. (F) All costs incurred as authorized under this section shall be paid out of the county general fund from money not otherwise appropriated, except that if the costs incurred exceed five hundred dollars, the board may borrow money from a financial institution to pay for the costs in whole or in part. (G) If a board of county commissioners proceeds under division (D) of this section, the board shall make a written report to the applicable county auditor of the board's action under this section. The board shall include in the report a legal description of the premises and a statement of all costs incurred in providing for the abatement, control, or removal of any animals as provided in this section, including the board's charges for its services, the costs incurred in providing notice, any fees or interest paid to borrow money, and the amount paid for labor, materials, and equipment. The county auditor shall place the costs upon the tax list. The costs are a lien upon the land from and after the date of the entry and shall be collected in the same manner as taxes on real property. The county treasurer shall provide for payment of any collected costs to the general fund of the county that filed the report under this division. Sec. 955.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Vicious dog" means a dog that has been designated as such in accordance with section 955.23 of the Revised Code or a dog that has previously engaged in a vicious dog act when evidence of such engagement is presented to a court and the court determines that the dog has engaged in a previous vicious dog act. (B) "Dangerous dog" means a dog that has been designated as such in accordance with section 955.23 of the Revised Code or a dog that has previously engaged in a dangerous dog act when evidence of such engagement is presented to a court and the court determines that the dog has engaged in a previous dangerous dog act. (C) "Nuisance dog" means a dog that has been designated as such in accordance with section 955.23 of the Revised Code or a dog that has previously engaged in a nuisance dog act when evidence of such engagement is presented to a court and the court determines that the dog has engaged in a previous nuisance dog act. (D) "Nuisance dog act," "dangerous dog act," and "vicious dog act" have the same meanings as in section 955.22 of the Revised Code. (E) "Police dog" means a dog that has been trained, and may be used, to assist one or more law enforcement officers in the performance of their official duties. (F) "Dog kennel" or "kennel" means an establishment that keeps, houses, and maintains adult dogs, as defined in section 956.01 of the Revised Code, for the purpose of breeding the dogs for a fee or other consideration received through a sale, exchange, or lease and that is not a high volume breeder licensed under Chapter 956. of the Revised Code. (G) "First generation wolfdog" means the offspring of the reproduction between a wolf with a domestic dog. (H)(1) "Wolfdog hybrid" means any of the following: (a) A first generation wolfdog; (b) The offspring of the reproduction between any of the following: (i) A first generation wolfdog with a wolf; (ii) A first generation wolfdog with a domestic dog; (iii) A first generation wolfdog with a first generation wolfdog. (c) An animal that is advertised or otherwise described or represented as a wolfdog hybrid by its owner. (2) For purposes of this chapter, references to a "dog" include a "wolfdog hybrid." Sec. 955.024. (A) Whenever a county auditor registers a dangerous or vicious dog or receives a notification regarding an address change from an owner, keeper, or harborer of a dangerous or vicious dog, the county auditor shall notify in writing the applicable county dog warden of such registration or address change. (B) Whenever a county auditor registers a wolfdog hybrid or receives a notification regarding an address change from an owner, keeper, or harborer of a wolfdog hybrid, the county auditor shall notify in writing the applicable county dog warden of such registration or address change. Sec. 955.025. (A)(1) In addition to obtaining a dog registration in accordance with division (A) of section 955.02 of the Revised Code, every person who is the owner, keeper, or harborer of a wolfdog hybrid shall apply for a wolfdog hybrid registration to the county auditor and submit all of the following to the county auditor: (a) A fee of one hundred dollars; (b) The person's address, telephone number, and other appropriate means for the county auditor to contact the person, along with proof that the person is eighteen years of age or older; (c) With respect to the person and the wolfdog hybrid for which the wolfdog hybrid registration is required, all of the following: (i) Either satisfactory evidence of the fact that the wolfdog hybrid has been neutered or spayed or a statement from a licensed veterinarian that neutering or spaying of the wolfdog hybrid is medically contraindicated; (ii) Satisfactory evidence of the fact that the person has posted and will continue to post clearly visible signs at the person's residence warning both minors and adults of the presence of a wolfdog hybrid on the property; (iii) Satisfactory evidence of the fact that the wolfdog hybrid has been permanently identified by means of a microchip and the wolfdog hybrid's microchip number. (2) The person shall renew the wolfdog hybrid registration annually for the same fee and in the same manner as the initial registration was obtained. (3) If a wolfdog hybrid registration holder relocates to a new county, the holder shall follow the procedure in division (C) of this section and, upon the expiration of the registration issued in the original county, shall renew the registration in the new county. (B) Upon submission in accordance with division (A) of this section, the county shall issue a wolfdog hybrid registration to the person. The county auditor also shall provide the owner with a uniformly designed tag that identifies the animal as a wolfdog hybrid. (C)(1) If the owner of a wolfdog hybrid for whom a wolfdog hybrid registration has previously been obtained relocates to a new address within the same county, the owner shall provide notice of the new address to the county auditor within ten days of relocating to the new address. (2) If the owner of a wolfdog hybrid for whom a wolfdog hybrid registration has previously been obtained relocates to a new address within another county, the owner shall do both of the following within ten days of relocating to the new address: (a) Provide written notice of the new address and a copy of the original wolfdog hybrid registration to the county auditor of the new county; (b) Provide written notice of the new address to the county auditor of the county where the owner previously resided. (D) An animal shelter that keeps or harbors a wolfdog hybrid more than three months of age is exempt from any registration requirements imposed under this section if it is a nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(a) and described in subsection 501(c)(3) of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 26 U.S.C 501(c)(3). (E) No owner, keeper, or harborer of a wolfdog hybrid shall fail to present a valid wolfdog hybrid registration upon request of any law enforcement officer, dog warden, or public health official charged with enforcing this section. A violation of this division is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. (F) No owner, keeper, or harborer of a wolfdog hybrid shall fail to do any of the following: (1) Obtain a wolfdog hybrid registration from the county auditor pursuant to this section; (2) Affix a tag that identifies the wolfdog hybrid as a wolfdog hybrid to the wolfdog hybrid's collar; (3) Ensure that the wolfdog hybrid wears the collar and tag at all times. A violation of division (F) of this section is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. (G)(1) Whoever violates division (E) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. (2) Whoever violates division (F) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree and a misdemeanor of the third degree on each subsequent offense. Sec. 955.11. (A) Upon the transfer of ownership of any dog, the seller of the dog shall give the buyer a transfer of ownership certificate that shall be signed by the seller. The certificate shall contain the registration number of the dog, the name of the seller, and a brief description of the dog. Blank forms of the certificate may be obtained from the county auditor. A transfer of ownership shall be recorded by the auditor upon presentation of a transfer of ownership certificate that is signed by the former owner of a dog and that is accompanied by a fee of five dollars. (B) Except as provided in division (C) of this section or section 955.111 of the Revised Code, prior to the transfer of ownership or possession of a dog, upon the buyer's or other transferee's request, the seller or other transferor of the dog shall give to the person a written notice relative to the behavior and propensities of the dog. (C) Within ten days after the transfer of ownership or possession of any dog, if the seller or other transferor of the dog has knowledge that the dog is a dangerous dog or vicious dog, the seller or other transferor shall give to the buyer or other transferee, the board of health for the district in which the buyer or other transferee resides, and the dog warden of the county in which the buyer or other transferee resides, a completed copy of a written form on which the seller shall furnish the following information: (1) The name and address of the buyer or other transferee of the dog; (2) The age, sex, color, breed, and current registration number of the dog. In addition, the seller shall answer the following questions, which shall be specifically stated on the form as follows: "Has the dog ever chased or attempted to attack or bite a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." "Has the dog ever bitten a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." "Has the dog ever seriously injured or killed a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." "Has the dog previously been designated a nuisance, dangerous, or vicious dog? If yes, indicate the designation that was assigned, the date of designation, and in which county or city the designation was made." The seller or other transferor shall obtain the signature of the buyer or other transferee after a statement on the form that the buyer or other transferee understands that such person is acquiring a dangerous or vicious dog. The dog warden of the county in which the seller resides shall furnish the form to the seller at no cost. (D)(1) No seller or other transferor of a dog shall fail to comply with the requirements of division (A) of this section. A violation of this division is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. (2) No seller or other transferor of a dog shall fail to comply with the requirements of division (B) or (C) of this section. A violation of this division is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. (E)(1) Whoever violates division (D)(1) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. (2) Whoever violates division (D)(2) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense and of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. (F) Division (C) of this section does not apply to an animal shelter for dogs with respect to a dog concerning which it transferred ownership or possession to another person if both of the following apply: (1) The animal shelter for dogs did not have knowledge and could not have reasonably ascertained that the dog is a dangerous or vicious dog. (2) Before the transfer of the dog, the animal shelter for dogs asked the following questions of the dog's previous owner, keeper, or harborer, if such person is known and if the dog was not impounded under section 959.132 of the Revised Code: (a) "Has the dog ever chased or attempted to attack or bite a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." (b) "Has the dog ever bitten a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." (c) "Has the dog ever seriously injured or killed a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." (d) "Has the dog previously been designated a nuisance, dangerous, or vicious dog? If yes, indicate the designation that was assigned, the date of designation, and in which county or city the designation was made." Sec. 955.111. (A) If a seller or other transferor of a dog has knowledge that the dog is a wolfdog hybrid, within ten days after the transfer of ownership or possession of the wolfdog hybrid, the seller or other transferor shall give to the buyer or other transferee, the board of health for the district in which the buyer or other transferee resides, and the dog warden of the county in which the buyer or other transferee resides, a completed copy of a written form on which the seller shall furnish the following information: (1) The name and address of the buyer or other transferee of the wolfdog hybrid; (2) The age, sex, color, applicable DNA information, and current registration number of the wolfdog hybrid. In addition, the seller shall answer the following questions, which shall be specifically stated on the form as follows: "Has the wolfdog hybrid ever chased or attempted to attack or bite a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." "Has the wolfdog hybrid ever bitten a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." "Has the wolfdog hybrid ever seriously injured or killed a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." The seller or other transferor shall obtain the signature of the buyer or other transferee after a statement on the form that the buyer or other transferee understands that such person is acquiring a wolfdog hybrid. The dog warden of the county in which the seller resides shall furnish the form to the seller at no cost. (B) No seller or other transferor of a wolfdog hybrid shall fail to comply with the requirements of division (A) of this section. A violation of this division is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. (C) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense and of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. (D) Division (A) of this section does not apply to an animal shelter for dogs with respect to a wolfdog hybrid concerning which it transferred ownership or possession to another person if both of the following apply: (1) The animal shelter for dogs did not have knowledge and could not have reasonably ascertained that the dog is a wolfdog hybrid. (2) Before the transfer of the wolfdog hybrid, the animal shelter for dogs asked the following questions of the wolfdog hybrid's previous owner, keeper, or harborer, if such person is known and if the wolfdog hybrid was not impounded under section 959.132 of the Revised Code: (a) "Has the dog ever chased or attempted to attack or bite a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." (b) "Has the dog ever bitten a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." (c) "Has the dog ever seriously injured or killed a person? If yes, describe the incident(s) in which the behavior occurred." Sec. 955.25. (A) No owner, keeper, or harborer of a wolfdog hybrid shall fail to do any of the following: (1) While that wolfdog hybrid is outdoors, but on the premises of the owner, keeper, or harborer, securely confine the wolfdog hybrid at all times in a locked pen that has a top, locked fenced yard with fencing that is sufficiently constructed to prevent escape, or other locked enclosure that has a top; (2) While that wolfdog hybrid is inside a residential dwelling or other building on the premises of the owner, keeper, or harborer, and there is an invitee inside the dwelling or building, securely confine the wolfdog hybrid at all times inside the dwelling or building so that there is no reasonable probability that the wolfdog hybrid comes into contact with the invitee; (3) While that wolfdog hybrid is off the premises of the owner, keeper, or harborer, keep that wolfdog hybrid on a chain-link leash or tether that is not more than six feet in length and additionally do at least one of the following: (a) Keep that wolfdog hybrid in a locked pen that has a top, locked fenced yard with fencing that is sufficiently constructed to prevent escape, or other locked enclosure that has a top; (b) Have the leash or tether controlled by a person who is of suitable age and discretion or securely attach, tie, or affix the leash or tether to the ground or a stationary object or fixture so that the wolfdog hybrid is adequately restrained and station such a person in close enough proximity to that wolfdog hybrid so as to prevent it from causing injury to any person; (c) Muzzle that wolfdog hybrid. A violation of division (A) of this section is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. (B) No owner, keeper, or harborer of a wolfdog hybrid shall fail to do any of the following: (1) Obtain liability insurance in an amount, exclusive of interest and costs, that equals or exceeds one hundred thousand dollars, with an insurer authorized to write liability insurance in this state providing coverage in each occurrence because of damage or bodily injury to or death of a person caused by the wolfdog hybrid; (2) Provide proof of that liability insurance upon request to any law enforcement officer, county dog warden, or public health official charged with enforcing this section; (3) Notify the local dog warden immediately if any of the following occurs: (a) The wolfdog hybrid is loose or unconfined. (b) The wolfdog hybrid bites a person, unless the dog is on the property of the owner of the wolfdog hybrid, and the person who is bitten is unlawfully trespassing or committing a criminal act within the boundaries of that property. (c) The wolfdog hybrid attacks another animal while the wolfdog hybrid is off the property of the owner of the wolfdog hybrid. (4) If the wolfdog hybrid is sold, given to another person, or dies, notify the county auditor and the dog warden within ten days of the sale, transfer, or death. (5) Prior to any training or veterinary care provided to the wolfdog hybrid by a trainer or licensed veterinarian, disclose to the trainer or licensed veterinarian, as applicable, that the wolfdog hybrid is a wolfdog hybrid. A violation of division (B) of this section is a strict liability offense and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. (C) No person shall recklessly do any of the following: (1) Debark or surgically silence a dog that the person knows or has reason to believe is a wolfdog hybrid; (2) Possess a wolfdog hybrid if the person knows or has reason to believe that the wolfdog hybrid has been debarked or surgically silenced; (3) Falsely attest on a waiver form provided by the veterinarian that the person's dog is not a wolfdog hybrid or otherwise provide false information on that written waiver form. (D) Before a veterinarian debarks or surgically silences a dog, the veterinarian may give the owner of the dog a written waiver form that attests that the dog is not a wolfdog hybrid. The written waiver form shall include all of the following: (1) The veterinarian's license number and current business address; (2) The number of the license of the dog if the dog is licensed; (3) A reasonable description of the age, coloring, and gender of the dog as well as any notable markings on the dog; (4) The signature of the owner of the dog attesting that the owner's dog is not a wolfdog hybrid; (5) A statement that Ohio law prohibits any person from doing any of the following: (a) Debarking or surgically silencing a dog that the person knows or has reason to believe is a wolfdog hybrid; (b) Possessing a wolfdog hybrid if the person knows or has reason to believe that the wolfdog hybrid has been debarked or surgically silenced; (c) Falsely attesting on a waiver form provided by the veterinarian that the person's dog is not a wolfdog hybrid or otherwise provide false information on that written waiver form. (E) It is an affirmative defense to a charge of a violation of division (C) of this section that the veterinarian who is charged with the violation obtained, prior to debarking or surgically silencing the dog, a written waiver form that complies with this section and that attests that the dog is not a wolfdog hybrid. (F)(1) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on a first offense and of a misdemeanor of the third degree on each subsequent offense. Additionally, the court may order the offender to do either or both of the following: (a) Personally supervise the wolfdog hybrid that the offender owns, keeps, or harbors; (b) Cause the wolfdog hybrid to complete obedience training. (2) The court, in the alternative, may order the wolfdog hybrid to be humanely destroyed by a licensed veterinarian or the county dog warden at the owner's expense. (G)(1) Whoever violates division (B)(1) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on a first offense and a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. (2) Whoever violates division (B)(2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor. (H) Whoever violates division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. Additionally, the court shall order that the wolfdog hybrid involved in the violation be humanely destroyed by a licensed veterinarian or the county dog warden. Until the court makes a final determination and during the pendency of any appeal of a violation of division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section and at the discretion of the dog warden, the wolfdog hybrid shall be confined or restrained in accordance with the provisions of division (A) of this section or at the county dog pound at the owner's expense. Section 2. That existing sections 955.01, 955.024, and 955.11 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.